Massachusetts, session 194th, S212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 23 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in the third sentence of the twelfth paragraph, the phrase
“alcoholic beverage sales” and inserting in place thereof the following phrase:- all sales.
of 1